Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,199
Reciprocity agreement or existing arrangement; validity.

Nothing in sections 60-3,179 to 60-3,182 or 60-3,198 shall affect the validity or operation of any reciprocity agreement or arrangement presently existing and in effect between Nebraska and any other jurisdiction, and all such agreements or arrangements shall continue until specifically canceled by the director or replaced by a new agreement or arrangement in accordance with the provisions of such sections.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 199.